New York, session 2025-2026, A1353.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The legislative law is amended by adding a new section 52-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 52-a. Requirements with respect to bills containing provisions 4 requiring appointments to be made by the legislature. 1. For purposes 5 of this section, the term "legislative leaders" shall mean the temporary 6 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority lead- 7 er of the senate and the minority leader of the assembly. 8 2. Any bill which establishes a commission, task force, board, coun- 9 cil, or similar body, and which requires that a number of the members on 10 such commission, task force, board, council, or similar body receive 11 their appointments from the legislature, shall have not less than one 12 member appointed by each of the legislative leaders. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03927-01-5